Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-246
Special education programs; reimbursement to option school district.

The State Department of Education shall reimburse each option school district for special education programs provided to option students in accordance with section 79-1142.

The resident school district of an option student shall be exempted from the payment responsibility set forth in section 79-1140.

For purposes of calculation to determine reimbursement pursuant to section 79-1142, the option school district shall include the adjusted average per pupil cost as defined in section 79-1114 of the option school district and not the amount received pursuant to section 79-245.

Laws 1989, LB 183, § 16;

Laws 1990, LB 843, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3416;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 50.